apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON ಇದು/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವೇ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವುಗಳ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ವುಗಳ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ವುಗಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ವಕ್ಕೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ವುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವುಗಳನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ oo__inc_clit  ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ದನ್ನ 	oo__inc_clit  ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ದನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ದನ್ನೇ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನ 	oo__inc_clit  ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕೆ  # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕಾಗಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಅರ್ಥ%<n%>%<nt%>:ದರರ್ಥ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದರಿಂದ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದರಿಂದಾಗಿ # ;


%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ದಕ್ಕೂ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ವುಗಳ e__inda  ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದರ ondige ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ ondu ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕ ondu ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿ ide__vaux ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ kinta ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ aagi__com ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದು varege__postpos;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ ante  ;


%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ವೆಲ್ಲವ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ವೆಲ್ಲಾ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ವೆಲ್ಲವನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ವೆಲ್ಲ kinta ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ವೆಲ್ಲ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ವೆರಡು #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ವೆರಡರ #;


LEXICON __prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON ಒಂದ__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ರಲ್ಲೇ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: aagi__com ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: kinta ;




LEXICON 			ಕೆಲವು__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ವರಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವೇ # ;



LEXICON 			ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಾದರ oo__inc_clit ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;

LEXICON 			ಯಾರು__prn
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು # ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o-clit ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾದರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;


LEXICON 			ಯಾವ__prn
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<rel%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<rel%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<rel%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;
!%<det%>%<interr%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ುದು # ;!ಯಾವನನ್ನೂ

LEXICON 			ಮುಂತಾದ__prn
%<det%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವುಗಳು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ವರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ವುಗಳ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ವುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ವುಗಳಿಂದ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;!ಮುಂತಾದವನ್ನು
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವುಗಳನ್ನು # ;!ಮುಂತಾದ



%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವ oo__inc_clit ;


LEXICON 			ಏನು__prn
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು # ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ೂ # ;
%<prn%>%<interr%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;

%<prn%>%<interr%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;


LEXICON  			ಎಲ್ಲ__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<nt%>%<nom%>:ವ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನೂ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾ # ;

LEXICON    			ಎಲ್ಲ__det 		
%<det%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:kinta ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾ # ;

LEXICON both/__det
%<det%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>: # ;

LEXICON that/__det
%<det%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON this_much__det
%<det%>%<def%>%<prox%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ು # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<prox%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:only__adv ;

LEXICON which__det
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ು # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ುದ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ದೇ # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ುದೆ #;!
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<acc%>:ುದನ್ನು #;!
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ುದಾದರ ondu ;

LEXICON that_much__det

%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:ು # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>%+ಮಟ್ಟಿಗೆ%<adv%>:ರಮಟ್ಟಿಗೆ # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:only__adv ;!ಅಷ್ಟೊಂದು
%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:eno ; !ಅಷ್ಟೇನೂ
%<det%>%<def%>%<dist%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ; !ಅಷ್ಟೇನೂ


LEXICON ಒಬ್ಬ/__det
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಬ್ಬ # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಬ್ಬನು # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಬ್ಬನಾದ # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>:ಬ್ಬರು # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<gen%>:ಬ್ಬರ # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಬ್ಬನ # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಬ್ಬನೇ # ;!alone
%<det%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಂದ # ;

%<det%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>:ಬ್ಬರ aagi__com ;

LEXICON this/__det
%<det%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<det%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: varege__postpos ;

LEXICON __det
%<det%>%<ind%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;




LEXICON __def/det
%<det%>%<def%>%<nt%>%<nom%>: # ;


LEXICON 			ಪ್ರತಿ__def/det
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<nom%>:ಿ # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ೀ  # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<nt%>%<nom%>:ಿಯೊಂದ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<nom%>:ಿಯೊಬ್ಬ  # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಿಯೊಬ್ಬರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<nom%>:ಿಯೊಬ್ಬನ oo__inc_clit  ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<dat%>:ಿಯೊಬ್ಬನಿಗು # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<m%>%<dat%>:ಿಯೊಬ್ಬನಿಗ oo__inc_clit ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<nom%>%+ಸಂಸ್ಥಾನ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿಸಂಸ್ಥಾನದ # ;
%<det%>%<def%>%<mfn%>%<nom%>%+ರಾಷ್ಟ್ರ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿರಾಷ್ಟ್ರದ # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಯಾವ:ಯಾವ  						which__det;
ಯಾವುದೇ:ಯಾವುದೇ 	 						__det;
ಇಷ್ಟು:ಇಷ್ಟ 						this_much__det;
ಅಷ್ಟು:ಅಷ್ಟ 						that_much__det;
ಎಷ್ಟು:ಎಷ್ಟ 						that_much__det;
ಹಲವಾರು:ಹಲವಾರು							__det;
ಇನ್ನುಳಿದ:ಇನ್ನುಳಿದ 						__det;
ಎ:ಎ 			 __def/det;!A
ಎ:ಏ 			 __def/det;
ಆಲ್:ಆಲ್ 		 __def/det;!All
ದಿ:ದಿ 		   	 __def/det;	!the
ಡಿ:ಡಿ 			 __def/det;	!the
ದ:ದ 			 __def/det;	!the	
ಓರ್ವ:ಓರ್ವ 								 __def/det;	
ತಲಾ:ತಲಾ 									 __def/det;	
ಅ:ಅ 									 __def/det;
ಇವೆರಡೂ:ಇವೆರಡೂ 							 __def/det;
ಪ್ರತಿ:ಪ್ರತ  								 ಪ್ರತಿ__def/det;
ಎಲ್ಲ:ಎಲ್ಲ 								 ಎಲ್ಲ__det; !All
ಎರಡೂ:ಎರಡೂ		  	both/__det;
ಈ:ಈ 		     	this/__det;
ಆ:ಆ 				that/__det;
ಒಬ್ಬ:ಒ 				ಒಬ್ಬ/__det;
ಎಲ್ಲ:ಎಲ್ಲ  				ಎಲ್ಲ__prn;
ಇಬ್ಬರು:ಇಬ್ಬರ 				ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn;
ಮೂವರು:ಮೂವರ 				ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn;
ಐವರು:ಐವರ 					ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn;
ಸರ್ವರು:ಸರ್ವರ            		ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn;
ನಾಲ್ವರು:ನಾಲ್ವರ 		  		 ಇಬ್ಬರು__prn;
ಯಾವ:ಯಾವ 		 			ಯಾವ__prn;
ಯಾರು:ಯಾರ 					ಯಾರು__prn;
ಏನು:ಏನ 						ಏನು__prn;
ಮುಂತಾದ:ಮುಂತಾದ 				ಮುಂತಾದ__prn;
ಮುಂತಾಗಿ:ಮುಂತಾಗಿ 				__prn;!?
ಇವೆರಡೂ:ಇವೆರಡೂ 			__prn;
ಮತ್ತೂಂದು:ಮತ್ತೂಂದು 		__prn;
ಅನೇಕ:ಅನೇಕ		  		__prn;	
ಮತ್ತೊಬ್ಬ:ಮತ್ತೊಬ್ಬ 		__prn;
ಕೆಲವೊಂದು:ಕೆಲವೊಂದು 		__prn;
ಸ್ವಲ್ಪ:ಸ್ವಲ್ಪ 			__prn;
ಅನ್ಯರು:ಅನ್ಯರು 			__prn;
ಬಹಳಷ್ಟು:ಬಹಳಷ್ಟು 		__prn;
ಕನಿಷ್ಠ:ಕನಿಷ್ಠ 			__prn;
ಕನಿಷ್ಟ:ಕನಿಷ್ಟ 			__prn;
ಮತ್ತಿತರ:ಮತ್ತಿತರ 			__prn;
ಇನ್ನುಳಿದ:ಇನ್ನುಳಿದ   		__prn;
ತಲಾ:ತಲಾ 			 		__prn;
ಇಟ್:ಇಟ್ 					__prn;	
ಯುವರ್:ಯುವರ್ 			__prn;
ದಿಸ್  					__prn;
ಹರ್  					__prn;
ಹಿಸ್ 					__prn;
ಒಂದ:ಒಂದ 				ಒಂದ__prn; 		   
ಕೆಲವು:ಕೆಲ		  			ಕೆಲವು__prn;
ಹಲವು:ಹಲ 				ಕೆಲವು__prn;
ಇದು:ಇ       	ಇದು/__prn;
